Illinois, session 104th, SB2285.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 1-106 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/1-106)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 1-106)7    Sec. 1-106. Bicycle. Every human-powered device and every 8low-speed electric bicycle, as defined in Section 1-140.10, 9with 2 or more wheels not less than 12 inches in diameter, 10operable pedals, and designated seats for the transportation 11of one or more persons. Every device propelled by human power 12upon which any person may ride, having two tandem wheels 13except scooters and similar devices.14(Source: P.A. 85-951.)